Nebraska, session 109, LB517.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB517 LB517
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 79-2,144, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
79-2,144 (1) The state school security director appointed pursuant
to section 79-2,143 shall be responsible for providing leadership and
support for safety and security for the public schools. Duties of the
director include, but are not limited to:
(a) (1) Collecting safety and security plans, required pursuant to
rules and regulations of the State Department of Education relating to
accreditation of schools, and other school security information from each
school system in Nebraska. School districts shall provide the state
school security director with the safety and security plans of the school
district, annual inspection information of protective door assemblies,
door-locking systems, and double-entry doors of school buildings within
the school district, and any other security information requested by the
director, but any plans or information submitted by a school district may
be withheld by the department pursuant to subdivision (9) of section
84-712.05;
(b) (2) Recommending minimum standards for school security on or
before January 1, 2016, to the State Board of Education;
(c) (3) Conducting an assessment of the security of each public
school building, which assessment shall be completed by August 31, 2019;
(d) Establishing standards related to protective door assemblies in
each school building that is used for the instruction of students, which
shall include requiring that every school board cause an annual
inspection of all applicable protective door assemblies to be conducted
by a trained inspector with appropriate knowledge, training, and
experience relating to door assemblies and building security;
(e) (4) Identifying deficiencies in school security based on the
minimum standards adopted by the State Board of Education and making
recommendations to school boards for remedying such deficiencies;
(f) (5) Establishing security awareness and preparedness tools and
-2-

LB517 LB517
2025 2025
training programs for public school staff;
(g) (6) Establishing research-based model instructional programs for
staff, students, and parents to address the underlying causes for violent
attacks on schools;
(h) (7) Overseeing behavioral and mental health training, with a
focus on suicide awareness and prevention in public schools pursuant to
section 79-2,146;
(i) (8) Establishing tornado preparedness standards which shall
include, but not be limited to, ensuring that every school conducts at
least two tornado drills per year;
(j) (9) Responding to inquiries and requests for assistance relating
to school security from private, denominational, and parochial schools;
(k) (10) Recommending curricular and extracurricular materials to
assist school districts in preventing and responding to cyberbullying and
digital citizenship issues; and
(l) (11) Carrying out the department's responsibilities under the
School Safety and Security Reporting System Act.
(2) For purposes of this section, protective door assemblies means
(a) doors with panic hardware or fire exit hardware, (b) door assemblies
in exit enclosures, (c) electronically controlled egress doors, and (d)
door assemblies with special locking arrangements, such as delayed
egress, sensor-released egress doors, and elevator-lobby doors.
Sec. 2. Original section 79-2,144, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-